Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB547.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4307(c.1) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4307. Use and display of illuminated signs.* * *(c.1) Transportation network company driver.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary, but subject to 53 Pa.C.S. § 57A01 (relating to definitions), a [Transportation Network Company Driver] transportation network company driver may display an illuminated sign provided by a [Transportation Network Company] transportation network company within the interior of [his or her] the driver's vehicle so long as [such] the sign is approved by the Pennsylvania Public Utility 123456789101112131415161718 Commission or the Philadelphia Parking Authority, as applicable. The [Transportation Network Company shall] transportation network company must file the illuminated sign with the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission for review and approval. If the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission does not approve the illuminated sign, the Philadelphia Parking Authority may approve the illuminated sign within their jurisdiction, after the [Transportation Network Company] transportation network company files the illuminated sign with the Philadelphia Parking Authority for review and approval. The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission and the Philadelphia Parking Authority shall each have 15 business days to review the illuminated sign, as applicable.(2) An illuminated sign authorized under paragraph (1) may not use blue illumination or substantially mimic lights authorized on vehicles under section 4572(a) (relating to visual signals on authorized vehicles).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0547PN0548 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819